Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 8. Motor Vehicle Security Interests

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 137, § 2, and Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1, both enacted a new article 7 in chapter 2 of this title. The article enacted by ch. 137, § 2, was redesignated as article 8 at the direction of the legislative service office.

§ 31-2-801.
Perfection of a security interest in a vehicle or motor vehicle.

Perfection of a security interest in a vehicle or motor vehicle required to be titled as hereinafter defined shall occur upon delivery of the following to the office of the county clerk in which the vehicle is located:

A financing statement or security agreement; and

A properly tendered, completed application for certificate of title along with the valid title of record issued pursuant to W.S.

31-2-103

.

Upon receiving the information required under subsection (a) of this section, the county clerk shall endorse the certificate of title to the vehicle or motor vehicle with the lien information, including the month, day and year it was delivered to the county clerk.

Each owner of a vehicle or motor vehicle concerning which an original or substitute certificate of title has been issued who encumbers the title thereto, shall deliver the certificate to the holder of the security interest who, within five (5) days thereafter, shall deliver the certificate to the clerk of the county in which the vehicle is located, and the clerk shall then endorse on the face of the certificate appropriate notation showing the date and amount of the security interest, and the name of the secured party. If the clerk issued the certificate, he shall immediately endorse the same security interest data on the certificate copy on file in his office. If the certificate was issued in some other county or state, he shall promptly transmit to the state or county officer who issued the certificate the same security interest data and the other officer shall promptly endorse same on the certificate copy on file in his office. Every financing statement or security agreement delivered pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall take effect and be in force from and after the time the secured party delivers a properly tendered, complete application for a certificate of title issued pursuant to W.S.

31-2-103

and the financing statement or security agreement to the office of the county clerk of the county in which the vehicle is located and not before, as to all creditors, subsequent purchasers and holders of a security interest in good faith for valuable consideration and without notice.

When a termination statement has been filed pursuant to W.S. 34.1-9-513, the owner of the motor vehicle shall present the certificate of title to the county clerk in whose office the financing statement has been filed, and the county clerk shall endorse a statement of the termination of the security interest on the face of the certificate. If the clerk issued the certificate of title, he shall endorse a like statement of termination of the security interest on the certificate copy on file in his office, but otherwise he shall promptly transmit to the state or county officer who issued the certificate of title the statement of termination for endorsement on the certificate copy on file in his office.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 129, § 2.

The term “vehicle or motor vehicle required to be licensed” and the words “vehicle” and “motor vehicle” as used in this section means and includes all vehicles, motor vehicles, house trailers, trailers, semitrailers, motor coaches, trailer coaches, trucks, motorcycles, multipurpose vehicles and mobile homes required by the motor vehicle laws of the state of Wyoming to have a certificate of title or required to be registered or licensed under the laws of this state and includes off-road recreational vehicles for which a certificate of title has been issued under the laws of this state.

When the certificate of title to the vehicle or motor vehicle is not available for perfection under subsection (a) of this section, a “transitional ownership document”, on a form prescribed by the department of transportation, may be delivered with the financing statement or security agreement and the fee as specified in W.S. 18-3-402(a)(xvi)(T) to enable a security interest to be perfected in a timely manner. The transitional ownership document serves to perfect a lien upon receipt by the county clerk as to all creditors, subsequent purchasers and holders of a security interest in good faith for valuable consideration and without notice. No endorsement on the transitional ownership document is required to perfect the security interest. Within ninety (90) days from the date of the financing statement or security agreement, the certificate of title shall be filed along with a five dollar ($5.00) fee with the county clerk. If the certificate of title is not timely filed, the transitional ownership document is invalid, without force and effect.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 137, § 2; 2003, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2021 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to laws pertaining to security interests in general, see article 9 of title 34.1

Amendment effective January 1, 2008. —

Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1, effective January 1, 2008, amends this section by inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), deleted "Two (2) steps are required for" at the beginning, substituted "titled" for "licensed," added "shall occur upon delivery of the following to the office of the county clerk in which the vehicle is located" and made a related change; deleted "must be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the vehicle is located" in (a)(i); added (a)(ii); redesignated former (a)(ii) as (b); rewrote current (b), which read, "A notation of the security interest must be endorsed on the certificate of title to the vehicle or motor vehicle, the endorsement to be made concurrently with the filing of the financing statement or security agreement"; redesignated former (b) through (f) as (c) through (g); in current (c), substituted "the" for "such" preceding "clerk" in the second sentence, substituted "the" for "such" preceding "other officer" in the third sentence, in the fourth sentence, substituted "delivered" for "when filed" and "the secured party delivers a properly tendered, complete application for a certificate of title issued pursuant to W.S.

31-2-103

and the financing statement or security agreement to the office of the county clerk of the county in which the vehicle is located" for "of filing"; in current (g), substituted "delivered" for "filed" in the first sentence and "receipt by the county clerk" for "the date of filing" in the second sentence.

Perfecting lien after bankruptcy petition. —

Bankruptcy court properly released a creditor's lien on a vehicle, where after bankruptcy court ordered return of the vehicle as well as its turnover, creditor attempted to note a lien on the title in the amount of $ 0.00, which was insufficient to satisfy Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-2-801

, prompting the bankruptcy court to observe that the creditor made the notation “out of spite;” moreover, the creditor did not seek relief from the automatic stay before attempting to note its lien, and, thus, it was proper for the bankruptcy court to prevent the creditor's attempt at perfecting its lien post-petition.
Johnson v. Smith (In re Johnson), 501 F.3d 1163,

2007 U.S. App. LEXIS 20688

(10th Cir. 2007).

§ 31-2-802.
Terminal rental adjustment clause.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of a motor vehicle or trailer that is not leased, or used, primarily for personal, family or household purposes, a transaction does not create a sale or security interest merely because the contract on which the transaction is based contains a terminal rental adjustment clause.

As used in this section, “terminal rental adjustment clause” means a provision in a contract permitting or requiring the rental price of a motor vehicle or trailer to be adjusted either upward or downward by reference to the amount realized upon sale or other disposition of the motor vehicle or trailer.

Nothing in this section exempts a motor vehicle or trailer from the payment of any fees or taxes required at the time of titling or registering a vehicle under article 1 of this chapter [§

31-2-101

et seq].

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 135, § 1.